en: Aircraft protective gear certification: CASA (Australia) approved; EASA ETSO (European TSO); EN (European Norm); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (for flotation devices); Transport Canada approved; UK CAA approved; USCG approved (for flotation devices); Other
es: Certificación de equipos de protección para aviones: Aprobado por CASA (Australia); EASA ETSO (TSO europea); EN (norma europea); FAA TSO (orden de estándar técnico); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; STANAG de la OTAN; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (para dispositivos de flotación); Aprobado por Transport Canada; Aprobado por UK CAA; Aprobado por USCG (para dispositivos de flotación); Otro
zh-TW: 飛機防護裝備認證: 獲 CASA (澳洲) 核准; EASA ETSO (歐洲技術標準規定); EN (歐洲標準); FAA TSO (技術標準規定); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE 航太 (AS); SOLAS (適用於漂浮設備); 獲加拿大交通部核准; 獲英國 CAA 核准; 獲 USCG 核准 (適用於漂浮設備); 其他
lt-LT: Orlaivių apsaugos įrangos sertifikavimas: Patvirtinta CASA (Australija); EASA ETSO (Europos TSO); EN (Europos norma); FAA TSO (Techninio standarto nurodymas); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (plūduriavimo įrenginiams); Patvirtinta „Transport Canada“; Patvirtinta JK CAA; Patvirtinta USCG (plūduriavimo įrenginiams); Kita
de: Zertifizierung von Flugzeugschutzausrüstung: CASA-Zulassung (Australien); EASA ETSO (European TSO); EN (Europäische Norm); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (für Schwimmhilfen); Zulassung von Transport Canada; UK-CAA-Zulassung; USCG-Zulassung (für Schwimmhilfen); Sonstige
ja: 航空機用防護ギアの認証: CASA (オーストラリア) 承認済み; EASA ETSO (European TSO); EN (欧州規格); FAA TSO (技術標準品承認); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (浮力装置用); カナダ運輸省承認済み; 英国CAA承認済み; USCG承認済み (浮力装置用); その他
pt-PT: Certificação do equipamento de proteção da aeronave: Aprovado pela CASA (Austrália); EASA ETSO (TSO europeia); EN (norma europeia); TSO da FAA (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (para dispositivos de flutuação); Aprovado pela Transport Canada; Aprovado pela CAA do Reino Unido; Aprovado pela USCG (para dispositivos de flutuação); Outro
ko: 항공기 보호 장비 인증: CASA(호주) 승인; EASA ETSO(유럽 TSO); EN(유럽 표준); FAA TSO(기술 표준품); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace(AS); SOLAS(구명 장치용); 캐나다 교통부 승인; 영국 CAA 승인; USCG 승인(구명 장치용); 기타
bg-BG: Сертификация на защитното оборудване на въздухоплавателното средство: Одобрено от CASA (Австралия); EASA ETSO (Европейски TSO); EN (Европейска норма); FAA TSO (Технически стандарт); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (за плавателни устройства); Одобрено от Transport Canada; Одобрено от UK CAA; Одобрено от USCG (за плавателни устройства); Друго
sv: Certifiering av flygskyddsutrustning: CASA-godkänd (Australien); EASA ETSO (Europeisk TSO); EN (Europeisk norm); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (för flytutrustning); Godkänd av Transport Canada; Godkänd av UK CAA; USCG-godkänd (för flytutrustning); Annan
nl: Certificering beschermende vliegtuiguitrusting: CASA (Australië) goedgekeurd; EASA ETSO (Europese TSO); EN (Europese norm); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NAVO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (voor drijfmiddelen); Transport Canada goedgekeurd; UK CAA goedgekeurd; USCG goedgekeurd (voor drijfmiddelen); Overig
pl: Certyfikacja sprzętu ochronnego do statków powietrznych: Zatwierdzenie CASA (Australia); EASA ETSO (European TSO); EN (Norma Europejska); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (dla urządzeń wypornościowych); Zatwierdzenie Transport Canada; Zatwierdzenie UK CAA; Zatwierdzenie USCG (dla urządzeń wypornościowych); Inne
sk-SK: Certifikácia ochranných prostriedkov pre lietadlá: Schválené CASA (Austrália); EASA ETSO (európske TSO); EN (európska norma); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (pre plávacie zariadenia); Schválené Transport Canada; Schválené UK CAA; Schválené USCG (pre plávacie zariadenia); Iná
tr: Uçak koruyucu ekipman sertifikasyonu: CASA (Avustralya) onaylı; EASA ETSO (Avrupa TSO); EN (Avrupa Normu); FAA TSO (Teknik Standart Emri); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (yüzdürme cihazları için); Transport Canada onaylı; UK CAA onaylı; USCG onaylı (yüzdürme cihazları için); Diğer
cs: Certifikace ochranných pomůcek pro letadla: Schváleno CASA (Austrálie); EASA ETSO (Evropské TSO); EN (evropská norma); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (pro plovací zařízení); Schváleno Transport Canada; Schváleno UK CAA; Schváleno USCG (pro plovací zařízení); Jiné
hu: Repülőgép védőfelszerelések tanúsítása: CASA (Ausztrália) által jóváhagyott; EASA ETSO (Európai TSO); EN (Európai szabvány); FAA TSO (Műszaki szabványrendelet); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (mentőmellényekhez); Transport Canada által jóváhagyott; UK CAA által jóváhagyott; USCG által jóváhagyott (mentőmellényekhez); Egyéb
zh-CN: 飞机防护装备认证: CASA（澳大利亚）认证; EASA ETSO（欧洲技术标准规定）; EN（欧洲标准）; FAA TSO（技术标准规定）; ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD（军用规范/军用标准）; NATO STANAG（北约标准化协议）; SAE 航空航天标准 (AS); SOLAS（适用于漂浮设备）; 加拿大交通部认证; 英国民航局认证; USCG 认证（适用于漂浮设备）; 其他
vi: Chứng nhận trang bị bảo hộ máy bay: Được CASA (Úc) phê duyệt; EASA ETSO (TSO châu Âu); EN (Tiêu chuẩn châu Âu); FAA TSO (Yêu cầu kỹ thuật tiêu chuẩn); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (dành cho thiết bị nổi); Được Transport Canada phê duyệt; Được UK CAA phê duyệt; Được USCG phê duyệt (dành cho thiết bị nổi); Khác
nb: Sertifisering av beskyttelsesutstyr for fly: CASA (Australia)-godkjent; EASA ETSO (Europeisk TSO); EN (Europeisk standard); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (for flyteutstyr); Transport Canada-godkjent; UK CAA-godkjent; USCG-godkjent (for flyteutstyr); Annet
el: Πιστοποίηση προστατευτικού εξοπλισμού αεροσκαφών: Εγκεκριμένο από CASA (Αυστραλία); EASA ETSO (European TSO); EN (European Norm); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (για συσκευές επίπλευσης); Εγκεκριμένο από Transport Canada; Εγκεκριμένο από UK CAA; Εγκεκριμένο από USCG (για συσκευές επίπλευσης); Άλλο
th: การรับรองอุปกรณ์ป้องกันอากาศยาน: ผ่านการรับรองจาก CASA (ออสเตรเลีย); EASA ETSO (European TSO); EN (European Norm); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (สำหรับอุปกรณ์ลอยตัว); ผ่านการรับรองจาก Transport Canada; ผ่านการรับรองจาก UK CAA; ผ่านการรับรองจาก USCG (สำหรับอุปกรณ์ลอยตัว); อื่นๆ
fi: Lentokoneen suojavarusteiden sertifiointi: CASA (Australia) -hyväksytty; EASA ETSO (European TSO); EN (European Norm); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (kelluntalaitteille); Transport Canada -hyväksytty; UK CAA -hyväksytty; USCG-hyväksytty (kelluntalaitteille); Muu
ru: Сертификация средств защиты самолета: Одобрено CASA (Австралия); EASA ETSO (Европейский TSO); EN (Европейская норма); FAA TSO (Технический стандартный ордер); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (для спасательных средств); Одобрено Министерством транспорта Канады; Одобрено UK CAA; Одобрено Береговой охраной США (для спасательных средств); Другое
da: Certificering af beskyttelsesudstyr til luftfartøjet: CASA-godkendt (Australien); EASA ETSO (europæisk TSO); EN (europæisk standard); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (til flydeudstyr); Transport Canada-godkendt; UK CAA-godkendt; USCG-godkendt (til flydeudstyr); Andet
pt-BR: Certificação de equipamentos de proteção para aeronaves: Aprovado pela CASA (Austrália); EASA ETSO (TSO Europeu); EN (Norma Europeia); FAA TSO (Ordem de Padrão Técnico); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (para dispositivos de flutuação); Aprovado pela Transport Canada; Aprovado pela CAA do Reino Unido; Aprovado pela USCG (para dispositivos de flutuação); Outro
fr: Norme de certification des équipements de protection aéronautiques: Approuvé par la CASA (Australie); EASA ETSO (European TSO); EN (Norme européenne); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; STANAG de l’OTAN; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (pour les dispositifs de flottaison); Approuvé par Transports Canada; Approuvé par la UK CAA; Approuvé par l’USCG (pour les dispositifs de flottaison); Autre
it: Certificazione dei dispositivi di protezione per aeromobili: Approvato CASA (Australia); ETSO EASA (TSO europeo); EN (Norma europea); TSO FAA (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; STANAG NATO; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (per dispositivi di galleggiamento); Approvato Transport Canada; Approvato CAA (Regno Unito); Approvato USCG (per dispositivi di galleggiamento); Altro
hr-HR: Certifikacija zrakoplovne zaštitne opreme: Odobrila CASA (Australija); EASA ETSO (europski TSO); EN (europska norma); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (za naprave za plutanje); Odobrio Transport Canada; Odobrila CAA (Ujedinjeno Kraljevstvo); Odobrio USCG (za naprave za plutanje); Ostalo
ro-RO: Certificarea echipamentului de protecție al aeronavei: Aprobat de CASA (Australia); EASA ETSO (TSO european); EN (Norma europeană); FAA TSO (Ordin tehnic standard); ISO; MIL-SPEC / MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (pentru dispozitive de flotație); Aprobat de Transport Canada; Aprobat de UK CAA; Aprobat de USCG (pentru dispozitive de flotație); Altele
sl-SI: Certificiranje zaščitne opreme letala: Odobreno pri CASA (Avstralija); EASA ETSO (evropski TSO); EN (evropski standard); FAA TSO (Technical Standard Order); ISO; MIL-SPEC/MIL-STD; NATO STANAG; SAE Aerospace (AS); SOLAS (za plavajoče naprave); Odobreno pri Transport Canada; Odobreno pri UK CAA; Odobreno pri USCG (za plavajoče naprave); Drugo